Arkansas, session 2025, SB427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code §§ 5-70-104 — 5-70-106 are amended to read as
follows:
5-70-104. Promoting prostitution in the first degree.
(a) A person commits the offense of promoting prostitution in the
first degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Advances prostitution by compelling a person by use of
physical force, or intimidation, or coercion to engage in prostitution or
profits from such coercive conduct by another; or
(2) Profits from conduct prohibited under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section that is committed by another person; or
(3) Advances prostitution or profits from prostitution of a
*CEB073*
04-01-2025 10:20:09 CEB073

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB427
person less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(b) Promoting prostitution in the first degree is a:
(1) Class D felony under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
Class C felony for a first offense; or
(2) Class B felony under subdivision (a)(2) of this section for
a second or subsequent offense.
(c)(1) In addition to any other sentence authorized by this section, a
person who violates this section by offering to pay, agreeing to pay, or
paying a fee to engage in sexual activity upon conviction shall be ordered to
pay a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500):
(A) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for a first
offense;
(B) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a second offense;
or
(C) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a third or
subsequent offense.
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Human Trafficking Victim Support Fund, or its successor
fund or successor fund account.

5-70-105. Promoting prostitution in the second degree.
(a) A person commits the offense of promoting prostitution in the
second degree if he or she knowingly advances prostitution or profits from
prostitution by managing, supervising, controlling, or owning, either alone
or in association with another, a house of prostitution or a prostitution
enterprise involving two (2) or more prostitutes:
(1) Manages, supervises, controls, or owns, either alone or in
association with another person, a house of prostitution or a prostitution
enterprise involving two (2) or more persons engaging in prostitution; or
(2) Manages or facilitates an online platforms, digital space,
or any other medium used for the solicitation of prostitution or that
advances prostitution.
04-01-2025 10:20:09 CEB073

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB427
(b) Promoting prostitution in the second degree is a Class A
misdemeanor:
(1) Class D felony for a first offense; or
(2) Class C felony for a second or subsequent offense.
(c)(1) In addition to any other sentence authorized by this section, a
person who violates this section by offering to pay, agreeing to pay, or
paying a fee to engage in sexual activity upon conviction shall be ordered to
pay a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500):
(A) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for a first
offense;
(B) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a second offense;
or
(C) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a third or
subsequent offense.
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Human Trafficking Victim Support Fund, or its successor
fund or successor fund account.

5-70-106. Promoting prostitution in the third degree.
(a) A person commits the offense of promoting prostitution in the
third degree if:
(1) Having a possessory or proprietary interest in premises that
he or she knows is being used for prostitution, the person fails to make
reasonable effort to halt or abate the use for prostitution; or
(2) He or she knowingly advances prostitution or profits from
prostitution.
(b) Promoting prostitution in the third degree is a Class B
misdemeanor
(1) Class A misdemeanor for a first offense; or
(2) Class D felony for a second or subsequent offense.
(c)(1) In addition to any other sentence authorized by this section, a
person who violates this section by offering to pay, agreeing to pay, or
04-01-2025 10:20:09 CEB073

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB427
paying a fee to engage in sexual activity upon conviction shall be ordered to
pay a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000):
(A) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for a first
offense;
(B) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a second offense;
or
(C) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a third or
subsequent offense.
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Human Trafficking Victim Support Fund, or its successor
fund or successor fund account.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 70, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
5-70-108. Promoting prostitution at a business — Civil liability.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Business" means a corporation, partnership, sole
proprietorship, limited liability corporation, or other business entity
organized under the laws of this state; and
(2) "Involved in a prostitution violation" means to the
knowledge of an owner, manager, or other person with an ownership interest in
the business, the business:
(A) Permits, facilitates, or allows prostitution to occur
on the premises of the business or through the business's operations;
(B) Employs, contracts, or otherwise engages individuals
for the purpose of prostitution or benefits from the employment, contracting
with, or otherwise engaging individuals for the purpose of prostitution;
(C) Fails to take reasonable measures to prevent
prostitution-related activities after receiving notice of prostitution-
related activities; or
(D) Advertises, promotes, or provides a platform for the
facilitation of prostitution.
04-01-2025 10:20:09 CEB073

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB427
(b) In addition to any other penalty or liability authorized by law, a
business involved in a prostitution violation is subject to the following
civil liability:
(1) For a first involvement in a prostitution violation, any
business license granted under the laws of the state to the business shall be
suspended for thirty (30) days, and the business shall be issued a civil
penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000);
(2) For a second involvement in a prostitution violation, any
business license granted under the laws of the state to the business shall be
suspended for sixty (60) days, and the business shall be issued a civil
penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and
(3) For a third or subsequent involvement in a prostitution
violation, any business license granted under the laws of the state shall be
revoked, and the business shall be issued a civil penalty of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000).
(c) Civil penalties received under subsection (b) of this section
shall be deposited into the Human Trafficking Victim Support Fund, or its
successor fund or successor fund account.

/s/J. Bryant
















04-01-2025 10:20:09 CEB073